West Virginia, session 2025, HB2644.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 16A. WEST VIRGINIA PARKWAYS, ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT AND TOURISM AUTHORITY. §17-16A-11.  State Road Construction Account. (a) There is hereby created within the State Road Fund a special revenue account to be known as the State Road Construction Account held in the State Treasury to be expended by the Division of Highways for construction, maintenance and repair of public highways and bridges in this state. The State Road Construction Account created in this section is a special revenue account in the State Treasury and is not part of the state General Revenue Fund.(b) The State Road Construction Account shall consist of:(1) All or any portion of the proceeds of any parkway revenue bonds issued pursuant to §17-16A-10 of code that the Parkways Authority, in its discretion, may credit to the State Road Construction Account, notwithstanding any provision of said section to the contrary;(2) Any appropriations, grants, gifts, contributions, or other revenues received by the State Road Construction Account from any source; and(3) All interest earned on moneys held in the account.(c) The funds in the special revenue account created by this section will be expended by the Division of Highways for the costs of acquisition, construction, reconstruction, maintenance, improvement or repair of public highways and bridges, as contained in the Division of Highways' Statewide Transportation Improvement Plan as it existed on June 1, 2017, or the West Virginia Division of Highways SOS Transportation Investment Program Candidate Project List dated May 3, 2017, in the following counties:(1) Raleigh County;(2) Fayette County;(3) Wyoming County; (4) Mercer County;(5) Kanawha County;(6) Greenbrier County;(7) Monroe County;(8) Summers County; (9) McDowell County; and (10) Nicholas County.(d) No funding to the counties listed in subsection (c) of this section, from the State Road Fund may be modified as a result of receiving any funding from the State Road Construction Account under this section. (e) The Division of Highways shall conduct a study to determine any funding that may have been disputed from the effective date of this section until January 1, 2026.